Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 2.91, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Corrections. The legislature intends that a redistricting plan encompass all the territory of this state, that no territory be omitted or duplicateddeleted text begin , that all districts consist of convenient contiguous territory substantially equal in population, and that political subdivisions not be divided more than necessary to meet constitutional requirementsdeleted text end new text begin and that the districts comply with sections 2.94 and 2.95new text end . Therefore, in implementing a redistricting plan for the legislature or for Congress, the secretary of state, after notifying the Legislative Coordinating Commission and the revisor of statutes, shall order the following corrections: (a) If a territory in this state is not named in the redistricting plan but lies within the boundaries of a district, it is a part of the district within which it lies. (b) If a territory in this state is not named in the redistricting plan but lies between the boundaries of two or more districts, it is a part of the contiguous district having the smallest population. (c) If a territory in this state is assigned in the redistricting plan to two or more districts, it is part of the district having the smallest population. (d) If a territory in this state is assigned to a district that consists of other territory containing a majority of the population of the district but with which it is not contiguous, the territory is a part of the contiguous district having the smallest population. (e) If the description of a district boundary line that divides a political subdivision is ambiguous because a highway, street, railroad track, power transmission line, river, creek, or other physical feature or census block boundary that forms part of the district boundary is omitted or is not properly named or has been changed, or because a compass direction for the boundary line is wrong, the secretary of state shall add or correct the name or compass direction and resolve the ambiguity in favor of creating districts deleted text begin of convenient, contiguous territory of substantially equal population that do not divide political subdivisions more than is necessary to meet constitutional requirementsdeleted text end new text begin that comply with sections 2.94 and 2.95new text end . Sec. 2. new text begin [2.94] DISTRICTING PRINCIPLES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Applicability. new text end new text begin Congressional and legislative districts must be drawn in accordance with the principles listed in this section. If districts cannot be drawn fully in accordance with all principles, priority must be given to the principles in the order in which they are listed, except when doing so would violate federal law, including requirements of the United States Constitution; the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended; and the Minnesota Constitution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Equal population. new text end new text begin Each congressional district must be as nearly equal in total population as practicable. Each legislative district must be substantially equal in total population. The maximum permissible deviation for a legislative district is three percent, plus or minus, from the total population of the ideal district. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Minority representation. new text end new text begin Districts must provide, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) the equal opportunity of racial, ethnic, and language minorities to participate in the political process and to elect candidates of their choice, whether alone or in coalition with others; and new text end new text begin (2) sizable racial, ethnic, and language minorities who constitute less than a voting-age majority of a district with an opportunity to substantially influence the outcome of an election. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Convenient contiguous territory. new text end new text begin Each district must consist of convenient contiguous territory. Contiguity by water is sufficient if the water is not a serious obstacle to travel within the district. A district with areas that touch only at a point is not contiguous. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Tribal reservations. new text end new text begin Federally recognized American Indian Tribal reservations may only be divided if: new text end new text begin (1) the division occurs because a portion of the reservation is not contiguous with another portion of the reservation; or new text end new text begin (2) despite the division, the known population of the reservation remains wholly located within a single district. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Communities of interest. new text end new text begin Districts must minimize the division of identifiable communities of interest. A community of interest may include a racial, ethnic, or linguistic group or any group with shared experiences or concerns, including but not limited to geographic, regional, social, cultural, historic, socioeconomic, occupational, trade, or transportation interests. Communities of interest do not include relationships with political parties, incumbents, or candidates. A political subdivision is not, by itself, a community of interest. Where communities of interest overlap, greater consideration must be given to those communities of interest whose representational needs would be most benefited from the community's inclusion in a single district. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Preserving political subdivisions. new text end new text begin Districts must minimize the division of counties, cities, school districts, and towns to the extent practicable. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [2.95] CANDIDATES; INCUMBENTS; STATEWIDE PARTISAN PREFERENCE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Candidates; incumbents. new text end new text begin A redistricting plan must not purposely favor or disfavor a candidate or incumbent. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Statewide partisan preference. new text end new text begin (a) The statewide proportion of districts in each redistricting plan that favor a political party must correspond closely to the statewide partisan preferences for the voters of Minnesota for that party. new text end new text begin (b) The statewide proportion of districts in each redistricting plan that favor a political party must be determined by: new text end new text begin (1) calculating the number of districts in the redistricting plan that would have been won by the candidates representing the first political party and the second political party using the two-party vote in each statewide partisan general election held in the preceding six years for which precinct-level data is available; new text end new text begin (2) dividing each of these numbers by the total number of districts in the redistricting plan to obtain the proportion of districts in the redistricting plan that would have been won by candidates representing the first political party and the second political party in each general election; and new text end new text begin (3) calculating the median of these proportions for each political party. new text end new text begin (c) The statewide partisan preferences of the voters of Minnesota must be determined by: new text end new text begin (1) calculating the proportion of the statewide two-party vote received by the candidates representing the first political party and the second political party in each statewide partisan general election held in the preceding six years for which precinct-level data is available; and new text end new text begin (2) calculating the median of these proportions for each political party. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this section, "correspond closely" means that the statewide proportion of districts in each redistricting plan that favor each political party deviates by no more than three percentage points in either direction, or if this is arithmetically impossible, by the smallest possible proportion that is larger than three percentage points, from the statewide partisan preferences of the voters of Minnesota. new text end